Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.012

[Art. 3] Jurisdiction to try certain personnel.

No person who has deserted from the organized militia may be relieved from amenability to the jurisdiction of this code by virtue of a separation from any later period of service.

[ 1989 c 48 s 3; 1989 c 11 s 9; 1963 c 220 s 3.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 1989 c 11 s 9 and by 1989 c 48 s 3, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section pursuant to RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Severability—1989 c 11: See note following RCW 9A.56.220.